Utah statutes.
77-40-103.   Expungement procedure overview.
The process for the expungement of records regarding the arrest,
investigation, detention, and conviction of a petitioner in this state is as
follows:
(1)  The petitioner shall apply to the bureau for a certificate of eligibility
for expungement and pay the application fee established by the department.
(2)  Once the eligibility process is complete, the bureau shall notify the
petitioner.
(3)  If the petitioner is qualified to receive a certificate of eligibility
for expungement, the petitioner shall pay the issuance fee established by the
department.
(4)  The petitioner shall file the certificate of eligibility with a petition
for expungement in the court in which the proceedings occurred.  If there were
no court proceedings, the petition may be filed in the district court where
the arrest occurred.
(5)  The petitioner shall deliver a copy of the petition and certificate to
the prosecutorial office that handled the court proceedings.  If there were no
court proceedings, the copy of the petition and certificate shall be delivered
to the county attorney's office in the jurisdiction where the arrest occurred.
(6)  If an objection to the petition is filed by the prosecutor or victim, a
hearing shall be set by the court and the prosecutor and victim notified of
the date.
(7)  If the court requests a response from Adult Probation and Parole and a
response is received, the petitioner may file a written reply to the response
within 15 days of receipt of the response.
(8)  An expungement may be granted without a hearing if no objection is
received.
(9)  Upon receipt of an order of expungement, the petitioner shall deliver
copies to all government agencies in possession of records relating to the
expunged matter.
